Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Chapter 16 Uniform TOD Security Registration

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1993, ch. 171, ch. 171, § 2, provides: “Unless displaced by the particular provisions of this act, the principles of law and equity supplement the provisions of this act.”

§ 2-16-101.
Short title; rules of construction.

This act shall be known as and may be cited as the “Uniform TOD Security Registration Act.”

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 171, § 1.

§ 2-16-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Beneficiary form” means a registration of a security which indicates the present owner of the security and the intention of the owner regarding the person who will become the owner of the security upon the death of the owner;

“Devisee” means any person designated in a will to receive a disposition of real or personal property;

“Heirs” mean those persons, including the surviving spouse, who are entitled under the statutes of intestate succession to the property of a decedent;

“Person” means an individual, a corporation, an organization or other legal entity;

“Personal representative” includes executor, administrator, successor personal representative, special administrator and persons who perform substantially the same function under the law governing their status;

“Property” includes both real and personal property or any interest therein and means anything that may be the subject of ownership;

“Register” including its derivatives, means to issue a certificate showing the ownership of a certificated security or, in the case of an uncertificated security, to initiate or transfer an account showing ownership of securities;

“Registering entity” means a person who originates or transfers a security title by registration and includes a broker maintaining security accounts for customers and a transfer agent or other person acting for or as an issuer of securities;

“Security” means a share, participation or other interest in property, in a business, or in an obligation of an enterprise or other issuer, and includes a certificated security, an uncertificated security and a security account;

“Security account” means:

A reinvestment account associated with a security, a securities account with a broker, a cash balance in a brokerage account, cash, cash equivalents, interest, earnings or dividends earned or declared on a security in an account, a reinvestment account, or a brokerage account, whether or not credited to the account before the owner’s death;

A cash balance or other property held for or due to the owner of a security as a replacement for or product of an account security, whether or not credited to the account before the owner’s death; or

An investment management or custody account with a trust company or a bank with trust powers, including the securities in the account, a cash balance in the account, and cash, cash equivalents, interest, earnings or dividends earned or declared on a security in the account, whether or not credited to the account before the owner’s death.

“State” includes any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and any territory or possession subject to the legislative authority of the United States;

“This act” means W.S.

2-16-101

through

2-16-112

.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 171, § 1; 2005, ch. 126, § 2.

The 2005 amendment

in (a)(x)(A), inserted “cash equivalents” before “interest”; and added (a)(x)(C).

Laws 2005, ch. 126, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 2-16-103.
Registration in beneficiary form; sole or joint tenancy ownership.

Only individuals whose registration of a security shows sole ownership by one (1) individual or multiple ownership by two (2) or more individuals with right of survivorship, rather than as tenants in common, may obtain registration in beneficiary form. Multiple owners of a security registered in beneficiary form hold as joint tenants with right of survivorship, as tenants by the entireties or as owners of community property held in survivorship form, and not as tenants in common.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 171, § 1.

§ 2-16-104.
Registration in beneficiary form; applicable law.

A security may be registered in beneficiary form if the form is authorized by this or a similar statute of the state of organization of the issuer or registering entity, the location of the registering entity’s principal office, the office of its transfer agent or its office making the registration, or by this or a similar statute of the law of the state listed as the owner’s address at the time of registration. A registration governed by the law of a jurisdiction in which this or similar legislation is not in force or was not in force when a registration in beneficiary form was made is nevertheless presumed to be valid and authorized as a matter of contract law.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 171, § 1.

§ 2-16-105.
Origination of registration in beneficiary form.

A security, whether evidenced by certificate or account, is registered in beneficiary form when the registration includes a designation of a beneficiary to take the ownership at the death of the owner or the deaths of all multiple owners.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 171, § 1.

§ 2-16-106.
Form of registration in beneficiary form.

Registration in beneficiary form may be shown by the words “transfer on death” or the abbreviation “TOD,” or by the words “pay on death” or the abbreviation “POD,” after the name of the registered owner and before the name of a beneficiary.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 171, § 1.

§ 2-16-107.
Effect of registration in beneficiary form.

The designation of a TOD beneficiary on a registration in beneficiary form has no effect on ownership until the owner’s death. A registration of a security in beneficiary form may be canceled or changed at any time by the sole owner or all then surviving owners without the consent of the beneficiary.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 171, § 1.

§ 2-16-108.
Ownership on death of owner.

On death of a sole owner or the last to die of all multiple owners, ownership of securities registered in beneficiary form passes to the beneficiary or beneficiaries who survive all owners. On proof of death of all owners and compliance with any applicable requirements of the registering entity, a security registered in beneficiary form may be reregistered in the name of the beneficiary or beneficiaries who survived the death of all owners. Until division of the security after the death of all owners, multiple beneficiaries surviving the death of all owners hold their interest as tenants in common. If no beneficiary survives the death of all owners, the security belongs to the estate of the deceased sole owner or the estate of the last to die of all multiple owners.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 171, § 1.

§ 2-16-109.
Protection of registering entity.

A registering entity is not required to offer or to accept a request for security registration in beneficiary form. If a registration in beneficiary form is offered by a registering entity, the owner requesting registration in beneficiary form assents to the protections given to the registering entity by this act.

By accepting a request for registration of a security in beneficiary form, the registering entity agrees that the registration will be implemented on death of the deceased owner as provided in this act.

A registering entity is discharged from all claims to a security by the estate, creditors, heirs or devisees of a deceased owner if it registers a transfer of the security in accordance with W.S.

2-16-108

and does so in good faith reliance (1) on the registration, (2) on this act, and (3) on information provided to it by affidavit of the personal representative of the deceased owner, or by the surviving beneficiary or by the surviving beneficiary’s representatives, or other information available to the registering entity. The protections of this act do not extend to a reregistration or payment made after a registering entity has received written notice from any claimant to any interest in the security objecting to implementation of a registration in beneficiary form. No other notice or other information available to the registering entity affects its right to protection under this act.

The protection provided by this act to the registering entity of a security does not affect the rights of beneficiaries in disputes between themselves and other claimants to ownership of the security transferred or its value or proceeds.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 171, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” see § 2-16-102(a)(xii).

§ 2-16-110.
Nontestamentary transfer on death.

A transfer on death resulting from a registration in beneficiary form is effective by reason of the contract regarding the registration between the owner and the registering entity and this act and is not testamentary.

This act does not limit the rights of creditors of security owners against beneficiaries and other transferees under other laws of this state.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 171, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in both subsections, see § 2-16-102(a)(xii).

§ 2-16-111.
Terms, conditions and forms for registration.

A registering entity offering to accept registrations in beneficiary form may establish the terms and conditions under which it will receive requests (1) for registrations in beneficiary form, and (2) for implementation of registrations in beneficiary form, including requests for cancellation of previously registered TOD beneficiary designations and requests for reregistration to effect a change of beneficiary. The terms and conditions so established may provide for proving death, avoiding or resolving any problems concerning fractional shares, designating primary and contingent beneficiaries, and substituting a named beneficiary’s descendants to take in the place of the named beneficiary in the event of the beneficiary’s death. Substitution may be indicated by appending to the name of the primary beneficiary the letters LDPS, standing for “lineal descendants per stirpes.” This designation substitutes a deceased beneficiary’s descendants who survive the owner for a beneficiary who fails to so survive, the descendants to be identified and to share in accordance with the law of the beneficiary’s domicile at the owner’s death governing inheritance by descendants of an intestate. Other forms of identifying beneficiaries who are to take on one (1) or more contingencies, and rules for providing proofs and assurances needed to satisfy reasonable concerns by registering entities regarding conditions and identities relevant to accurate implementation of registrations in beneficiary form, may be contained in a registering entity’s terms and conditions.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 171, § 1.

§ 2-16-112.
Application of act.

This act applies to registrations of securities in beneficiary form made before or after July 1, 1993, by decedents dying on or after July 1, 1993.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 171, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 2-16-102(a)(xii).